Utah statutes.
13-31-202.   Transfer of ownership to molder.
(1)  If a customer does not claim possession from a molder of a mold within
three years following the last prior use of the mold, the molder may transfer
all rights and title to the mold in accordance with this section.
(2) (a)  Prior to obtaining all rights and title to the mold, the molder shall
send written notice by registered mail to the last-known address of the
customer notifying the customer that the molder is terminating the customer's
rights and title to the mold.
(b)  The notice required under Subsection (2)(a) shall disclose the rights of
the customer under Subsection (3).
(3)  All rights and title of the customer to the mold are transferred to the
molder 120 days from the date the notice required by Subsection (2)(a) is sent
unless the customer:
(a)  responds in person or by mail to claim possession of the mold within the
120-day period; or
(b)  makes other contractual arrangements with the molder for the storage of
the mold.
(4)  After rights and title to a mold are transferred to the molder under
Subsection (2), the molder may destroy or otherwise dispose of the mold
without liability to the customer.
